Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.084

[Art. 11] Reports and receiving of prisoners.

(1) No provost marshal, commander of a guard, master at arms, warden, keeper, or officer of a city or county jail or any other jail, penitentiary, or prison designated under RCW 38.38.080, may refuse to receive or keep any prisoner committed to his or her charge, when the committing person furnishes a statement, signed by the committing person, of the offense charged against the prisoner.

(2) Every commander of a guard, master at arms, warden, keeper, or officer of a city or county jail or of any other jail, penitentiary, or prison designated under RCW 38.38.080, to whose charge a prisoner is committed shall, within twenty-four hours after that commitment or as soon as he or she is relieved from guard, report to the commanding officer of the prisoner the name of the prisoner, the offense charged against the prisoner, and the name of the person who ordered or authorized the commitment.

[ 1989 c 48 s 12; 1963 c 220 s 12.]